Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2138
Code of ethics; board; duties; duty to report violations.

(1) The board shall adopt a code of ethics which is essentially in agreement with the current code of ethics of the national and state associations of the specialty professions included in mental health practice and which the board deems necessary to assure adequate protection of the public in the provision of mental health services to the public. A violation of the code of ethics shall be considered an act of unprofessional conduct.

(2) The board shall ensure through the code of ethics and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Mental Health Practice Act that persons licensed or certified pursuant to the act or holding privileges to practice in Nebraska as professional counselors under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact limit their practice to demonstrated areas of competence as documented by relevant professional education, training, and experience.

(3) Intentional failure by a mental health practitioner to report known acts of unprofessional conduct by a mental health practitioner to the department or the board shall be considered an act of unprofessional conduct and shall be grounds for disciplinary action under appropriate sections of the Uniform Credentialing Act unless the mental health practitioner has acquired such knowledge in a professional relationship otherwise protected by confidentiality.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 56;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 151;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,337;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 48;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 755;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 20.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.